Louisiana, session 2026, SB397.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
8 Section 1. R.S. 18:586(C) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
9 §586. Vacancies caused by retirement, resignation, or removal; prohibitions
10 * * *
11 C. This Section does not purport to impact the constitutional authority
12 of the supreme court to appoint a sitting or retired judge to any court, and the
13 provisions of Subsection A of this Section shall not be applicable to judgeships.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.